Illinois, session 104th, HB1348.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Sections 3-412 and 11-1426.1 and by adding Section 63-806.11 as follows: 7    (625 ILCS 5/3-412)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-412)8    Sec. 3-412. Registration plates or digital registration 9plates and registration stickers or digital registration 10stickers to be furnished by the Secretary of State.11    (a) The Secretary of State upon registering a vehicle 12subject to annual registration for the first time shall issue 13or shall cause to be issued to the owner one registration plate 14or digital registration plate for a motorcycle, trailer, 15semitrailer, moped, autocycle, or truck-tractor, 2 16registration plates, or a digital registration plate and metal 17plate as set forth in Section 3-401.5, for other motor 18vehicles and, where applicable, current registration stickers 19or digital registration stickers for motor vehicles of the 20first division. The provisions of this Section may be made 21applicable to such vehicles of the second division, as the 22Secretary of State may, from time to time, in his discretion 23designate. On subsequent annual registrations during the term   HB1348- 2 -LRB104 06001 LNS 16034 b1of the registration plate or digital registration plate as 2provided in Section 3-414.1, the Secretary shall issue or 3cause to be issued registration stickers or digital 4registration stickers as evidence of current registration. 5However, the issuance of annual registration stickers or 6digital registration stickers to vehicles registered under the 7provisions of Sections 3-402.1 and 3-405.3 of this Code may 8not be required if the Secretary deems the issuance 9unnecessary.10    (b) Every registration plate or digital registration plate 11shall have displayed upon it the registration number assigned 12to the vehicle for which it is issued, the name of this State, 13which may be abbreviated, the year number for which it was 14issued, which may be abbreviated, the phrase "Land of Lincoln" 15(except as otherwise provided in this Code), and such other 16letters or numbers as the Secretary may prescribe. However, 17for apportionment plates issued to vehicles registered under 18Section 3-402.1 and fleet plates issued to vehicles registered 19under Section 3-405.3, the phrase "Land of Lincoln" may be 20omitted to allow for the word "apportioned", the word "fleet", 21or other similar language to be displayed. Registration plates 22or digital registration plates issued to a vehicle registered 23as a fleet vehicle may display a designation determined by the 24Secretary.25    The Secretary may in his discretion prescribe that letters 26be used as prefixes only on registration plates or digital   HB1348- 3 -LRB104 06001 LNS 16034 b1registration plates issued to vehicles of the first division 2which are registered under this Code and only as suffixes on 3registration plates or digital registration plates issued to 4other vehicles. Every registration sticker or digital 5registration sticker issued as evidence of current 6registration shall designate the year number for which it is 7issued and such other letters or numbers as the Secretary may 8prescribe and shall be of a contrasting color with the 9registration plates or digital registration plates and 10registration stickers or digital registration stickers of the 11previous year.12    (c) Each registration plate or digital registration plate 13and the required letters and numerals thereon, except the year 14number for which issued, shall be of sufficient size to be 15plainly readable from a distance of 100 feet during daylight, 16and shall be coated with reflectorizing material. The 17dimensions of the plate issued to vehicles of the first 18division shall be 6 by 12 inches.19    (d) The Secretary of State shall issue for every passenger 20motor vehicle rented without a driver the same type of 21registration plates or digital registration plates as the type 22of plates issued for a private passenger vehicle.23    (e) The Secretary of State shall issue for every passenger 24car used as a taxicab or livery, distinctive registration 25plates or digital registration plates.26    (f) The Secretary of State shall issue for every   HB1348- 4 -LRB104 06001 LNS 16034 b1motorcycle distinctive registration plates or digital 2registration plates distinguishing between motorcycles having 3150 or more cubic centimeters piston displacement, or having 4less than 150 cubic centimeter piston displacement.5    (g) Registration plates or digital registration plates 6issued to vehicles for-hire may display a designation as 7determined by the Secretary that such vehicles are for-hire.8    (h) (Blank).9    (i) The Secretary of State shall issue for every public 10and private ambulance registration plates or digital 11registration plates identifying the vehicle as an ambulance. 12The Secretary shall forward to the Department of Healthcare 13and Family Services registration information for the purpose 14of verification of claims filed with the Department by 15ambulance owners for payment for services to public assistance 16recipients.17    (j) The Secretary of State shall issue for every public 18and private medical carrier or rescue vehicle livery 19registration plates or digital registration plates displaying 20numbers within ranges of numbers reserved respectively for 21medical carriers and rescue vehicles. The Secretary shall 22forward to the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 23registration information for the purpose of verification of 24claims filed with the Department by owners of medical carriers 25or rescue vehicles for payment for services to public 26assistance recipients.  HB1348- 5 -LRB104 06001 LNS 16034 b1    (k) The Secretary of State shall issue distinctive license 2plates or digital registration plates or distinctive license 3plate stickers or digital registration stickers for every 4vehicle exempted from subsections (a) and (a-5) of Section 512-503 by subsection (g) of that Section, and by subsection 6(g-5) of that Section before its deletion by this amendatory 7Act of the 95th General Assembly. The Secretary shall issue 8these plates or stickers immediately upon receiving the 9physician's certification required under subsection (g) of 10Section 12-503. New plates or stickers shall also be issued 11when the certification is renewed as provided in that 12subsection. 13    (l) The Secretary of State shall issue distinctive 14registration plates or digital registration plates for 15low-speed vehicles. 16    (m) The Secretary of State shall issue distinctive 17registration plates or digital registration plates for 18autocycles. The dimensions of the plate issued to autocycles 19shall be 4 by 7 inches. 20    (n) The Secretary of State shall issue distinctive 21registration plates or digital registration plates for 22non-highway vehicles. The Secretary shall issue these plates 23only to non-highway vehicles that meet the requirements set 24forth in subsections (e) and (g) of Section 11-1426.1. The 25Secretary shall collect and deposit the registration fee as 26required under Section 3-806.10   HB1348- 6 -LRB104 06001 LNS 16034 b1(Source: P.A. 101-395, eff. 8-16-19.) 2    (625 ILCS 5/3-806.11 new)3    Sec. 3-806.11. Registration fees for non-highway vehicles. 4Every owner of a non-highway vehicle that drives upon any 5street, highway, or roadway with a posted speed limit of 35 6miles per hour or less or any county highway with a posted 7speed limit of 55 miles per hour or less shall pay the 8Secretary of State an annual registration fee of $76. The fee 9shall be distributed as follows: $1 to the State Treasurer, 10for deposit into the State Police Service Fund; $30 to the 11State Treasurer, for deposit into the Road Fund; and $45 to the 12Treasurer of the county of residence of the owner of the 13non-highway vehicle, for deposit into the road fund of the 14county. 15    (625 ILCS 5/11-1426.1)16    Sec. 11-1426.1. Operation of non-highway vehicles on 17streets, roads, and highways.18    (a) As used in this Section, "non-highway vehicle" means a 19motor vehicle not specifically designed to be used on a public 20highway, including:21        (1) an all-terrain vehicle, as defined by Section 22    1-101.8 of this Code;23        (2) a golf cart, as defined by Section 1-123.9;24        (3) an off-highway motorcycle, as defined by Section   HB1348- 7 -LRB104 06001 LNS 16034 b1    1-153.1; and2        (4) a recreational off-highway vehicle, as defined by 3    Section 1-168.8. 4    (b) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, it is 5unlawful for any person to drive or operate a non-highway 6vehicle upon any street, highway, or roadway in this State. If 7the operation of a non-highway vehicle is authorized under 8subsection (d), the non-highway vehicle may be operated only 9on streets where the posted speed limit is 35 miles per hour or 10less. This subsection (b) does not prohibit a non-highway 11vehicle from crossing a road or street at an intersection 12where the road or street has a posted speed limit of more than 1335 miles per hour.14    (b-5) A person may not operate a non-highway vehicle upon 15any street, highway, or roadway in this State unless he or she 16has a valid driver's license issued in his or her name by the 17Secretary of State or by a foreign jurisdiction.18    (c) No person operating a non-highway vehicle shall make a 19direct crossing upon or across any tollroad, interstate 20highway, or controlled access highway in this State. No person 21operating a non-highway vehicle shall make a direct crossing 22upon or across any other highway under the jurisdiction of the 23State except at an intersection of the highway with another 24public street, road, or highway. 25    (c-5) (Blank).26    (d) A municipality, township, county, or other unit of   HB1348- 8 -LRB104 06001 LNS 16034 b1local government may authorize, by ordinance or resolution, 2the operation of non-highway vehicles on roadways under its 3jurisdiction if the unit of local government determines that 4the public safety will not be jeopardized. The Department may 5authorize the operation of non-highway vehicles on the 6roadways under its jurisdiction if the Department determines 7that the public safety will not be jeopardized. The unit of 8local government or the Department may restrict the types of 9non-highway vehicles that are authorized to be used on its 10streets.11    Before permitting the operation of non-highway vehicles on 12its roadways, a municipality, township, county, other unit of 13local government, or the Department must consider the volume, 14speed, and character of traffic on the roadway and determine 15whether non-highway vehicles may safely travel on or cross the 16roadway. Upon determining that non-highway vehicles may safely 17operate on a roadway and the adoption of an ordinance or 18resolution by a municipality, township, county, or other unit 19of local government, or authorization by the Department, 20appropriate signs shall be posted.21    If a roadway is under the jurisdiction of more than one 22unit of government, non-highway vehicles may not be operated 23on the roadway unless each unit of government agrees and takes 24action as provided in this subsection.25    (e) No non-highway vehicle may be operated on a roadway 26unless, at a minimum, it has the following: brakes, a steering   HB1348- 9 -LRB104 06001 LNS 16034 b1apparatus, tires, a rearview mirror, red reflectorized warning 2devices in the front and rear, a slow moving emblem (as 3required of other vehicles in Section 12-709 of this Code) on 4the rear of the non-highway vehicle, a headlight that emits a 5white light visible from a distance of 500 feet to the front, a 6tail lamp that emits a red light visible from at least 100 feet 7from the rear, brake lights, and turn signals. When operated 8on a roadway, a non-highway vehicle shall have its headlight 9and tail lamps lighted as required by Section 12-201 of this 10Code.11    (f) A person who drives or is in actual physical control of 12a non-highway vehicle on a roadway while under the influence 13is subject to Sections 11-500 through 11-502 of this Code.14    (g) Any person who operates a non-highway vehicle on a 15street, highway, or roadway shall be subject to the mandatory 16insurance requirements under Article VI of Chapter 7 of this 17Code. 18    (h) It shall not be unlawful for any person to drive or 19operate a non-highway vehicle, as defined in paragraphs (1) 20and (4) of subsection (a) of this Section, on a county roadway 21or township roadway for the purpose of conducting farming 22operations to and from the home, farm, farm buildings, and any 23adjacent or nearby farm land.24    Non-highway vehicles, as used in this subsection (h), 25shall not be subject to subsections (e) and (g) of this 26Section. However, if the non-highway vehicle, as used in this   HB1348- 10 -LRB104 06001 LNS 16034 b1Section, is not covered under a motor vehicle insurance policy 2pursuant to subsection (g) of this Section, the vehicle must 3be covered under a farm, home, or non-highway vehicle 4insurance policy issued with coverage amounts no less than the 5minimum amounts set for bodily injury or death and for 6destruction of property under Section 7-203 of this Code. 7Non-highway vehicles operated on a county or township roadway 8at any time between one-half hour before sunset and one-half 9hour after sunrise must be equipped with head lamps and tail 10lamps, and the head lamps and tail lamps must be lighted.11    Non-highway vehicles, as used in this subsection (h), 12shall not make a direct crossing upon or across any tollroad, 13interstate highway, or controlled access highway in this 14State. 15    Non-highway vehicles, as used in this subsection (h), 16shall be allowed to cross a State highway, municipal street, 17county highway, or road district highway if the operator of 18the non-highway vehicle makes a direct crossing provided:19        (1) the crossing is made at an angle of approximately 20    90 degrees to the direction of the street, road or highway 21    and at a place where no obstruction prevents a quick and 22    safe crossing;23        (2) the non-highway vehicle is brought to a complete 24    stop before attempting a crossing;25        (3) the operator of the non-highway vehicle yields the 26    right of way to all pedestrian and vehicular traffic which   HB1348- 11 -LRB104 06001 LNS 16034 b1    constitutes a hazard; and2        (4) that when crossing a divided highway, the crossing 3    is made only at an intersection of the highway with 4    another public street, road, or highway. 5    (i) No action taken by a unit of local government under 6this Section designates the operation of a non-highway vehicle 7as an intended or permitted use of property with respect to 8Section 3-102 of the Local Governmental and Governmental 9Employees Tort Immunity Act. 10    (j) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, a 11non-highway vehicle with a registration plate issued under 12subsection (n) of Section 3-412 may be operated on any street, 13highway, or roadway where the posted speed limit is 35 miles 14per hour or less or any county highway where the posted speed 15limit is 55 miles per hour or less. 16    Non-highway vehicles, as used in this subsection (j), 17shall not make a direct crossing upon or across any tollroad, 18interstate highway, or controlled access highway in this 19State.20    Non-highway vehicles, as used in this subsection (j), may 21cross a State highway, municipal street, county highway, or 22road district highway if:23        (1) the crossing is made at an angle of approximately 24    90 degrees to the direction of the street, road, or 25    highway and at a place where no obstruction prevents a 26    quick and safe crossing;  HB1348- 12 -LRB104 06001 LNS 16034 b1        (2) the non-highway vehicle is brought to a complete 2    stop before attempting a crossing;3        (3) the operator of the non-highway vehicle yields the 4    right of way to all pedestrian and vehicular traffic which 5    constitutes a hazard; and6        (4) when crossing a divided highway, the crossing is 7    made only at an intersection of the highway with another 8    public street, road, or highway. 9(Source: P.A. 97-144, eff. 7-14-11; 98-567, eff. 1-1-14.)